Louisiana, session 2026, SB69.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 34:1951(B)(2)(a), (c), (d), and (g) are hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
§1951. Creation of South Tangipahoa Parish Port Commission
* * *
B.(1) * * *
(2) Upon the expiration of the term of each member whose term expires as
provided in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection or the creation of a vacancy in the seat
of any such member, whichever occurs first, the governor shall appoint the successor
to the member, subject to Senate confirmation, as follows and in the following order:
(a) First, one member from a list of three nominees submitted by the senator
representing Senate District Six Thirty-seven.
* * *
(c) Third, one member from a list of three nominees submitted by the senator
representing Senate District Eleven Thirty-seven.
(d) Fourth, one member from a list of three nominees submitted by the
Pontchatoula Ponchatoula Chamber of Commerce.
* * *
(g) Seventh, one member from a list of three nominees submitted by the
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 69 ENROLLED
senator representing Senate District Six, Thirty-seven and the representative
representing House of Representatives District Seventy-three, and the senator
representing Senate District Eleven.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.